th: ระดับความปลอดภัย: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
nb: Sikkerhetsnivå: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
ro-RO: Nivel de securitate: Ridicat; Redus; Medie; Altele
it: Livello di sicurezza: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
vi: Cấp độ bảo mật: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
pt-BR: Nível de segurança: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
hr-HR: Razina sigurnosti: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
ja: セキュリティレベル: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
es: Nivel de seguridad: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
pt-PT: Nível de segurança: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
de: Sicherheitsstufe: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
fi: Turvallisuustaso: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
en: Security level: High; Low; Medium; Other
nl: Beveiligingsniveau: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
da: Sikkerhedsniveau: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
bg-BG: Ниво на сигурност: Високо; Ниско; Средно; Други
sk-SK: Úroveň zabezpečenia: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
tr: Güvenlik Seviyesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο ασφαλείας: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
pl: Poziom bezpieczeństwa: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
lt-LT: Apsaugos lygis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
sl-SI: Stopnja varnosti: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
zh-CN: 安全级别: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
hu: Biztonsági szint: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
zh-TW: 安全等級: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
sv: Säkerhetsnivå: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
fr: Niveau de sécurité: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
cs: Úroveň zabezpečení: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
ru: Уровень безопасности: Высокая; Низкая; Средняя; Другой
ko: 보안 수준: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타